North Dakota statutes. TITLE 48 Public Buildings
CHAPTER 48-06 Capitol Central Mailing Bureau

48-06-01.
Establishment — Rules and regulations.

The director of the office of management and budget shall maintain and operate a central mailing bureau in the state capitol. The director shall prescribe such reasonable rules and regulations as may be necessary for the prompt and efficient dispatch of all mail.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 214, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 48-0601; 1991, ch. 592, § 16.

48-06-02.
Capitol building departments — Compliance with regulations of mailing department.

All state officers, departments, or agencies housed in the state capitol shall deliver all official mail originating in the capitol, unstamped, to the central mailing bureau in compliance with the regulations prescribed for the delivery of outgoing mail. This section shall not apply to those officers, departments, or agencies which are prohibited by state or federal law from disclosing mailing lists which by law are made confidential.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 214, §§ 2, 3; R.C. 1943, § 48-0602.

48-06-03.
Departments exempt from using central mailing bureau.

The director of the office of management and budget may exempt any department where it is determined that it would not be practical or economical for it to use the central mailing bureau, because of the unusual weight, kind, or volume of mail dispatched by the department.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 214, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 48-0603; S.L. 1991, ch. 592, § 17.

48-06-04.
Purchasing supplies — Employing mail clerks — Office of management and budget.

The director of the office of management and budget shall provide a suitable room and shall employ the necessary mailing bureau staff. The director also shall purchase postage meter machines and such other equipment, materials, and supplies as are necessary for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 214, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 48-0604; S.L. 1991, ch. 592, § 18; 1999, ch. 407, § 1.

48-06-05.
Official stamp on all mail.

All mail dispatched through the mailing bureau shall have stamped or printed thereon by the meter machine the following words “Official Mail State of North Dakota”.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 214, § 6; R.C. 1943, § 48-0605.

48-06-06.
Office of management and budget postage revolving fund.

There shall be maintained in the office of the state treasurer an “office of management and budget postage revolving fund” for the advance payment of postage. The director of the office of management and budget may draw upon the fund for the advance payment of postage for the use of the central mailing bureau, and all collections from the several offices, departments, and agencies, for postage used by them, are hereby appropriated and shall be paid into the fund. The provisions of section 54-27-10 shall not apply to the fund nor shall any part of the fund revert at the expiration of any biennium.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 214, § 7; R.C. 1943, § 48-0606; S.L. 1949, ch. 294, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 48-0606; S.L. 1991, ch. 592, § 19.

48-06-07.
Voucher for postage used — Presented to departments by mailing clerk.

The mailing clerk or such other person as may be designated by the director of the office of management and budget under the direction of the director shall keep an accurate and complete record of all postage used by each officer, department, or agency, for mail dispatched through the central mailing bureau and shall present at least monthly to each such officer, department, or agency, a bill or voucher in the form prescribed by law, for the amount of postage used. After approval by the office of the budget, the amount shall be credited to the postal revolving fund of the office of management and budget out of the postage appropriation of the officer, department, or agency.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 214, § 8; R.C. 1943, § 48-0607; S.L. 1991, ch. 592, § 20.